Illinois, session 104th, SB1340.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Gas Use Tax Law is amended by changing 5Section 5-10 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 173/5-10)7    Sec. 5-10. Imposition of tax. Beginning October 1, 2003, a 8tax is imposed upon the privilege of using in this State gas 9obtained in a purchase of out-of-state gas at the rate of 2.4 10cents per therm or 5% of the purchase price for the billing 11period, whichever is the lower rate. Such tax rate shall be 12referred to as the "self-assessing purchaser tax rate". 13Beginning with bills issued by delivering suppliers on and 14after October 1, 2003, purchasers may elect an alternative tax 15rate of 2.4 cents per therm to be paid under the provisions of 16Section 5-15 of this Law to a delivering supplier maintaining 17a place of business in this State. Such tax rate shall be 18referred to as the "alternate tax rate". The tax imposed under 19this Section shall not apply to gas used by business 20enterprises certified under Section 9-222.1 of the Public 21Utilities Act or Section 605-1115 of the Department of 22Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil 23Administrative Code of Illinois, as amended, to the extent of   SB1340- 2 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1such exemption and during the period of time specified by the 2Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity.3    The tax imposed under this Section does not apply to gas 4used by any business enterprise that is properly assigned or 5included within one of the following Standard Industrial 6Classifications, as designated in the 1987 Standard Industrial 7Classification Manual prepared by the federal Office of 8Management and Budget: 10; 12; 13; 14; 21; 22; 23; 24; 25; 26; 927; 28; 29; 30; 31; 32; 33; 34; 35; 36; 37; 38; or 39. 10(Source: P.A. 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.) 11    Section 10. The Gas Revenue Tax Act is amended by changing 12Section 1 as follows: 13    (35 ILCS 615/1)  (from Ch. 120, par. 467.16)14    Sec. 1. For the purposes of this Act: "Gross receipts" 15means the consideration received for gas distributed, 16supplied, furnished or sold to persons for use or consumption 17and not for resale, and for all services (including the 18transportation or storage of gas for an end-user) rendered in 19connection therewith, and shall include cash, services and 20property of every kind or nature, and shall be determined 21without any deduction on account of the cost of the service, 22product or commodity supplied, the cost of materials used, 23labor or service costs, or any other expense whatsoever. 24However, "gross receipts" shall not include receipts from:   SB1340- 3 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1        (i) any minimum or other charge for gas or gas service 2    where the customer has taken no therms of gas; 3        (ii) any charge for a dishonored check; 4        (iii) any finance or credit charge, penalty or charge 5    for delayed payment, or discount for prompt payment; 6        (iv) any charge for reconnection of service or for 7    replacement or relocation of facilities; 8        (v) any advance or contribution in aid of 9    construction; 10        (vi) repair, inspection or servicing of equipment 11    located on customer premises; 12        (vii) leasing or rental of equipment, the leasing or 13    rental of which is not necessary to distributing, 14    furnishing, supplying, selling, transporting or storing 15    gas; 16        (viii) any sale to a customer if the taxpayer is 17    prohibited by federal or State constitution, treaty, 18    convention, statute or court decision from recovering the 19    related tax liability from such customer; 20        (ix) any charges added to customers' bills pursuant to 21    the provisions of Section 9-221 or Section 9-222 of the 22    Public Utilities Act, as amended, or any charges added to 23    customers' bills by taxpayers who are not subject to rate 24    regulation by the Illinois Commerce Commission for the 25    purpose of recovering any of the tax liabilities or other 26    amounts specified in such provisions of such Act; and   SB1340- 4 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1        (x) prior to October 1, 2003, any charge for gas or gas 2    services to a customer who acquired contractual rights for 3    the direct purchase of gas or gas services originating 4    from an out-of-state supplier or source on or before March 5    1, 1995, except for those charges solely related to the 6    local distribution of gas by a public utility. This 7    exemption includes any charge for gas or gas service, 8    except for those charges solely related to the local 9    distribution of gas by a public utility, to a customer who 10    maintained an account with a public utility (as defined in 11    Section 3-105 of the Public Utilities Act) for the 12    transportation of customer-owned gas on or before March 1, 13    1995. The provisions of this amendatory Act of 1997 are 14    intended to clarify, rather than change, existing law as 15    to the meaning and scope of this exemption. This exemption 16    (x) expires on September 30, 2003.17    In case credit is extended, the amount thereof shall be 18included only as and when payments are received.19    "Gross receipts" shall not include consideration received 20from business enterprises certified under Section 9-222.1 of 21the Public Utilities Act, as amended, to the extent of such 22exemption and during the period of time specified by the 23Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity.24    "Gross receipts" does not include consideration received 25from any business enterprise that is properly assigned or 26included within one of the following Standard Industrial   SB1340- 5 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1Classifications, as designated in the 1987 Standard Industrial 2Classification Manual prepared by the federal Office of 3Management and Budget: 10; 12; 13; 14; 21; 22; 23; 24; 25; 26; 427; 28; 29; 30; 31; 32; 33; 34; 35; 36; 37; 38; or 39. 5    "Department" means the Department of Revenue of the State 6of Illinois.7    "Director" means the Director of Revenue for the 8Department of Revenue of the State of Illinois.9    "Taxpayer" means a person engaged in the business of 10distributing, supplying, furnishing or selling gas for use or 11consumption and not for resale.12    "Person" means any natural individual, firm, trust, 13estate, partnership, association, joint stock company, joint 14adventure, corporation, limited liability company, or a 15receiver, trustee, guardian or other representative appointed 16by order of any court, or any city, town, county or other 17political subdivision of this State.18    "Invested capital" means that amount equal to (i) the 19average of the balances at the beginning and end of each 20taxable period of the taxpayer's total stockholder's equity 21and total long-term debt, less investments in and advances to 22all corporations, as set forth on the balance sheets included 23in the taxpayer's annual report to the Illinois Commerce 24Commission for the taxable period; (ii) multiplied by a 25fraction determined under Sections 301 and 304(a) of the 26"Illinois Income Tax Act" and reported on the Illinois income   SB1340- 6 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1tax return for the taxable period ending in or with the taxable 2period in question. However, notwithstanding the income tax 3return reporting requirement stated above, beginning July 1, 41979, no taxpayer's denominators used to compute the sales, 5property or payroll factors under subsection (a) of Section 6304 of the Illinois Income Tax Act shall include payroll, 7property or sales of any corporate entity other than the 8taxpayer for the purposes of determining an allocation for the 9invested capital tax. This amendatory Act of 1982, Public Act 1082-1024, is not intended to and does not make any change in the 11meaning of any provision of this Act, it having been the intent 12of the General Assembly in initially enacting the definition 13of "invested capital" to provide for apportionment of the 14invested capital of each company, based solely upon the sales, 15property and payroll of that company.16    "Taxable period" means each period which ends after the 17effective date of this Act and which is covered by an annual 18report filed by the taxpayer with the Illinois Commerce 19Commission.20(Source: P.A. 93-31, eff. 10-1-03; 94-793, eff. 5-19-06.) 21    Section 15. The Electricity Excise Tax Law is amended by 22changing Section 2-4 as follows: 23    (35 ILCS 640/2-4)24    Sec. 2-4. Tax imposed.   SB1340- 7 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1    (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), a tax is imposed 2on the privilege of using in this State electricity purchased 3for use or consumption and not for resale, other than by 4municipal corporations owning and operating a local 5transportation system for public service, at the following 6rates per kilowatt-hour delivered to the purchaser:7        (i) For the first 2000 kilowatt-hours used or consumed 8    in a month: 0.330 cents per kilowatt-hour;9        (ii) For the next 48,000 kilowatt-hours used or 10    consumed in a month: 0.319 cents per kilowatt-hour;11        (iii) For the next 50,000 kilowatt-hours used or 12    consumed in a month: 0.303 cents per kilowatt-hour;13        (iv) For the next 400,000 kilowatt-hours used or 14    consumed in a month: 0.297 cents per kilowatt-hour;15        (v) For the next 500,000 kilowatt-hours used or 16    consumed in a month: 0.286 cents per kilowatt-hour;17        (vi) For the next 2,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 18    consumed in a month: 0.270 cents per kilowatt-hour;19        (vii) For the next 2,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 20    consumed in a month: 0.254 cents per kilowatt-hour;21        (viii) For the next 5,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 22    consumed in a month: 0.233 cents per kilowatt-hour;23        (ix) For the next 10,000,000 kilowatt-hours used or 24    consumed in a month: 0.207 cents per kilowatt-hour;25        (x) For all electricity in excess of 20,000,000 26    kilowatt-hours used or consumed in a month: 0.202 cents   SB1340- 8 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1    per kilowatt-hour.2    Provided, that in lieu of the foregoing rates, the tax is 3imposed on a self-assessing purchaser at the rate of 5.1% of 4the self-assessing purchaser's purchase price for all 5electricity distributed, supplied, furnished, sold, 6transmitted and delivered to the self-assessing purchaser in a 7month.8    (b) A tax is imposed on the privilege of using in this 9State electricity purchased from a municipal system or 10electric cooperative, as defined in Article XVII of the Public 11Utilities Act, which has not made an election as permitted by 12either Section 17-200 or Section 17-300 of such Act, at the 13lesser of 0.32 cents per kilowatt hour of all electricity 14distributed, supplied, furnished, sold, transmitted, and 15delivered by such municipal system or electric cooperative to 16the purchaser or 5% of each such purchaser's purchase price 17for all electricity distributed, supplied, furnished, sold, 18transmitted, and delivered by such municipal system or 19electric cooperative to the purchaser, whichever is the lower 20rate as applied to each purchaser in each billing period.21    (c) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 22respect to any use of electricity by business enterprises 23certified under Section 9-222.1 or 9-222.1A of the Public 24Utilities Act, as amended, to the extent of such exemption and 25during the time specified by the Department of Commerce and 26Economic Opportunity; or with respect to any transaction in   SB1340- 9 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1interstate commerce, or otherwise, to the extent to which such 2transaction may not, under the Constitution and statutes of 3the United States, be made the subject of taxation by this 4State.5    (d) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 6respect to any use of electricity at a REV Illinois Project 7site that has received a certification for tax exemption from 8the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity pursuant 9to Section 95 of the Reimagining Energy and Vehicles in 10Illinois Act, to the extent of such exemption, which shall be 11no more than 10 years. 12    (e) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 13respect to any use of electricity at a project site that has 14received a certification for tax exemption from the Department 15of Commerce and Economic Opportunity pursuant to the 16Manufacturing Illinois Chips for Real Opportunity (MICRO) Act, 17to the extent of such exemption, which shall be no more than 10 18years. 19    (f) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 20respect to any use of electricity at a quantum computing 21campus that has received a certification for tax exemption 22from the Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 23pursuant to Section 605-1115 of the Department of Commerce and 24Economic Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 25Illinois to the extent of the exemption and during the period 26of time specified by the Department of Commerce and Economic   SB1340- 10 -LRB104 06513 HLH 16549 b1Opportunity. 2    (g) The tax imposed by this Section 2-4 is not imposed with 3respect to any use by the purchaser in the process of 4manufacturing or assembling tangible personal property for 5wholesale or for retail sale or lease. 6(Source: P.A. 102-669, eff. 11-16-21; 102-700, eff. 4-19-22; 7102-1125, eff. 2-3-23; 103-595, eff. 6-26-24.) 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.